California, session 20252026, AB942.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 748.5 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:748.5. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), subdivisions (c) and (d), the commission shall require revenues, including any accrued interest, received by an electrical corporation as a result of the direct allocation of greenhouse gas allowances to electric utilities pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 95890 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations to be credited directly to the residential, small business, and emissions-intensive trade-exposed retail customers of the electrical corporation.(b) Not later than January 1, 2013, the commission shall require the adoption and implementation of a customer outreach plan for each electrical corporation, including, but not limited to, such measures as notices in bills and through media outlets, for purposes of obtaining the maximum feasible public awareness of the crediting of greenhouse gas allowance revenues. Costs associated with the implementation of this plan are subject to recovery in rates pursuant to Section 454.(c) The commission may allocate up to 15 percent of the revenues, including any accrued interest, received by an electrical corporation as a result of the direct allocation of greenhouse gas allowances to electrical distribution utilities pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 95890 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, for clean energy and energy efficiency projects established pursuant to statute that are administered by the electrical corporation, or a qualified third-party administrator as approved by the commission, and that are not otherwise funded by another funding source.(d) A residential customer who is not enrolled in the California Alternate Rates for Energy (CARE) program pursuant to Section 739.1 or the Family Electric Rate Assistance Program (FERA) pursuant to Section 739.12, and whose total annual electricity bills from the previous year is less than three hundred dollars ($300), shall not receive the credit described in subdivision (a).SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a)Senate Bill 100 of the 2017–18 Regular Session (Chapter 312 of the Statutes of 2018) established the state policy that eligible renewable energy resources and zero-carbon resources supply 100 percent of all retail sales of electricity to California end-use customers by 2045. Senate Bill 1020 of the 2021–22 Regular Session (Chapter 361 of the Statutes of 2022) established the same 100 percent renewable energy procurement standard for electricity serving all state agencies by 2035.(b)Senate Bill 1078 of the 2001–02 Regular Session (Chapter 516 of the Statutes of 2002) established the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program, which has been subsequently amended to require all load-serving entities to procure 60 percent of their electricity portfolios from eligible renewable energy resources by 2030.(c)Rooftop solar has been integral towards meeting the state’s clean energy goals, with over 2,000,000 solar installations in California as of 2024.(d)Subsidies for residential rooftop solar have been provided to spur installation since the enactment of Senate Bill 656 of the 1995–96 Regular Session (Chapter 369 of the Statutes of 1995). These subsidies offer solar customers credits on their electricity bills for the self-generated electricity they send back to the electrical grid.(e)The current rates of these subsidies create a significant shortfall for covering the fixed costs of the electrical grid, and nonsolar ratepayers make up the difference, often referred to as a cost shift.(f)According to the Public Advocate’s Office of the Public Utilities Commission, this cost shift on nonrooftop solar customers of Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Southern California Edison Company, and San Diego Gas & Electric Company has grown from $3.4 billion annually in 2021 to $8.5 billion annually by the end of 2024. These trends suggest that the cost shift will continue to grow.(g)For the average nonsolar ratepayer, this cost shift accounts for 21 to 27 percent, inclusive, of their electricity bill.(h)In 2023, the average annual household income of residential rooftop solar customers was an estimated $115,000.(i)Conversely, in 2021, low-income customers that were enrolled in the California Alternate Rates for Energy program represented 28 percent of total residential customers, but only 13.1 percent of these customers benefited from rooftop solar subsidy programs.(j)As the overall cost of living increases in the state, the Legislature must mitigate cost shift inequities and reduce utility bills by evaluating programs funded by utility ratepayers.SEC. 2.Section 2827.2 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:2827.2.(a)On and after January 1, 2026, all of the following shall apply to a customer of a large electrical corporation that becomes a new eligible customer-generator by purchasing real property that contains a renewable electrical generation facility upon which a prior eligible customer-generator took service:(1)The new eligible customer-generator shall take service under the then-current applicable tariff adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 2827.1 after December 1, 2022.(2)The new eligible customer-generator shall not be eligible for the avoided cost calculator plus glide path provided in commission Decision 22-12-056 (December 19, 2022), Order Instituting Rulemaking to Revisit Net Energy Metering Tariffs Pursuant to Decision 16-01-044, and to Address Other Issues Related to Net Energy Metering.(3)The new eligible customer-generator shall pay all nonbypassable charges applicable to customers who are not eligible customer-generators.(b)The commission may adopt a new tariff for new eligible customer-generators described in subdivision (a), and may require those eligible customer-generators to use that new tariff if it results in a lower cost impact on customers who are not eligible customer-generators than the prior tariff that was applicable to those eligible customer-generators.(c)On and after January 1, 2026, eligible customer-generators shall not receive the customer credit provided in Section 748.5.(d)This section does not apply to new eligible customer-generators that are public schools or agricultural customers.(e)For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:(1)“Eligible customer-generator” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2827.(2)“Large electrical corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2827.(3)“Public school” means a school operated by a school district as described in Section 41302.5 of the Education Code, a charter school that has been granted a charter pursuant to the Charter Schools Act of 1992 (Part 26.8 (commencing with Section 47600) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code), or a public higher education entity as described in Section 66010 of the Education Code.(4)“Renewable electrical generation facility” has the same meaning as in Section 2827. SEC. 3.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.